California, session 20252026, AB264.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 896.1 of the Military and Veterans Code is repealed.896.1.No dependent of a veteran, as defined in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 890, shall be eligible to receive the benefits of this article during the time that he is entitled to receive federal educational benefits under Chapter 35, Title 38, United States Code, as amended, or duplicate assistance from any other government source.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________